Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1508
Willful or corrupt false swearing; registration of voters; penalty.

Any person who is guilty of willful or corrupt false swearing in taking an oath prescribed by or upon any examination provided for in sections 32-301 to 32-330 or upon being challenged as unqualified to register to vote shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 407.